North Carolina, session 2025, SB986.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. TITLE AND INTRODUCTION
SECTION 1.(a) Title. – This act shall be known and may be cited as the Workforce
Act of 2026.
SECTION 1.(b) Introduction. – The appropriations made in this act are for the
amounts necessary to modernize education-to-workforce pathways across the State, to improve
credit acquisition and transfer for students, strengthen career information sharing among
institutions of higher education and employers, and expand employer-recognized credentials to
provide faster, clearer routes to credential completion and career success.

PART II. APPRENTICESHIP NC SUPPORT
SECTION 2.(a) Findings. – The General Assembly finds that work-based learning
is of value to learners as well as employers; that apprenticeship is a highly effective work-based
learning model and provides a significant return on investment; that continued growth of
apprenticeship is important to the State's economy; that ApprenticeshipNC is critical to
increasing the number of employers participating in apprenticeships as well as the number of
registered apprentices in North Carolina; that continued growth of apprenticeship is at risk
without adequate support for ApprenticeshipNC; and that additional State support is necessary
to sustain apprenticeship growth.
SECTION 2.(b) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Community Colleges System Office the sum of three million one hundred thousand dollars
($3,100,000) in recurring funds beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the administration
of the ApprenticeshipNC program.

PART III. NC WORKFORCE CREDENTIALS

NC WORKFORCE CREDENTIALS OPERATIONAL EXPENSES AND STAFFING
SECTION 3.1.(a) Findings. – The General Assembly finds that, due to the critical
importance to the State of identifying industry-valued credentials, promoting programs of study
leading to industry-valued credentials, and aligning industry-valued credentials and programs of
study leading to those credentials with federal Workforce Pell Grant implementation, it is
*S986-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
necessary that the State provide funds to the Department of Commerce (Department) to develop
and maintain a list of industry-valued credentials, to continually determine programs of study to
meet workforce needs, and to ensure alignment to federal Workforce Pell Grants.
SECTION 3.1.(b) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department the sum of three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) in recurring funds,
beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year, for operational expenses and staffing to support NC
Workforce Credentials in accordance with this section and G.S. 143B-438.10.
SECTION 3.1.(c) Data Coordination. – The Department shall engage with
employers to provide workforce data and participate in efforts to link data on industry-valued
credentials to labor market outcomes, including:
(1) Labor market demand.
(2) Job placement and Standard Occupational Classification or similar data
reflecting employment-in-field.
(3) Wage outcomes.
(4) Stackability-capacity for credentials to count toward and build into more
advanced career credentials.
(5) Work location, collected on a voluntary basis and in a manner consistent with
applicable State and federal privacy protections, to support aggregated
analysis of regional workforce outcomes, talent retention, and analysis of
education and career pathways alignment with local labor market demand.
SECTION 3.1.(d) Stakeholder Consultation. – As part of its efforts to link data on
industry-valued credentials to labor market outcomes, the Department shall consult with the
North Carolina Community Colleges System Office, The University of North Carolina System
Office, and other relevant stakeholders to ensure alignment with rules and regulations pertaining
to federal Workforce Pell Grants and to take steps to institutionalize workforce data sharing
across State government.
SECTION 3.1.(e) Longitudinal Data. – As part of its efforts to link data on
industry-valued credentials to labor market outcomes, the Department shall encourage issuers of
those credentials to submit data pertaining to credentials issued to the North Carolina
Longitudinal Data System for inclusion in the System's Licenses and Credentials Data
Warehouse to enhance the State's ability to retrieve and link those data to labor market outcomes.
SECTION 3.1.(f) Wage-Outcome Prioritization. – In developing and maintaining
the list of industry-valued credentials, the Department shall give substantial weight to
demonstrated wage outcomes and evidence that credential attainment provides a positive return
on investment for students.
SECTION 3.1.(g) Outreach. – Of the funds appropriated to the Department under
subsection (b) of this section, the Department may use up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) each
fiscal year for outreach and communications consistent with the purposes of this section,
including to contract with non-State entities for outreach and communications.

ADDITIONAL FUNDS FOR SHORT-TERM WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
GRANTS
SECTION 3.2.(a) Findings. – The General Assembly finds that, due to the critical
need in this State to provide financial aid for students pursuing industry-valued credentials,
including in programs of study that are not eligible for federal Workforce Pell Grants, it is in the
State's interest to provide an increase of funds to the North Carolina Community College
Short-Term Workforce Development Grant Program.
SECTION 3.2.(b) G.S. 115D-10.19 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(e) Administrative Costs. – The North Carolina Community Colleges System Office may
use up to four percent (4%) of the funds appropriated for the Program for administrative costs
associated with administration of the Program."
Page 2 Senate Bill 986-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.2.(c) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Community Colleges System Office the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in recurring
funds beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the Short-Term Workforce Development
Grant Program.

PART IV. SEAMLESS POSTSECONDARY TRANSFER

INCLUDE NORTH CAROLINA INDEPENDENT COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES IN
COMMON DIGITAL TRANSCRIPT
SECTION 4.1. The State Education Assistance Authority, in consultation with the
Department of Public Instruction, the Community Colleges System Office, The University of
North Carolina System Office, the North Carolina Independent Colleges and Universities, and
the College Foundation, Inc., shall incorporate the private colleges and universities located in
this State into the common digital transcript developed pursuant to Section 8A.15 of S.L.
2023-134. No later than March 15, 2027, the Authority shall report to the Joint Legislative
Education Oversight Committee on the progress made toward this goal, including at least the
following information:
(1) Any additional steps to be taken for this purpose and a time line for completing
those steps and publishing the transcript to students enrolled at private
colleges and universities in this State.
(2) Estimates of any additional costs needed to expand the common digital
transcript to private colleges and universities.

EXPANSION OF POSTSECONDARY TRANSFER TECHNOLOGY
SECTION 4.2.(a) Findings. – The General Assembly makes the following findings
regarding the current state of postsecondary transfer technology at institutions of higher
education in North Carolina:
(1) Seamless postsecondary transfer and reverse transfer reduces barriers for
learners and aligns to statewide economic and workforce goals.
(2) The Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2023, S.L. 2023-134,
authorized and supported statewide postsecondary data and technology
initiatives to improve student outcomes, including transfer efficiency.
(3) Expanding technology to support the transfer of student credits among and
between institutions of higher education will reduce the time it takes for
students to earn a degree and reduce costs.
(4) Successful postsecondary transfer and reverse transfer is necessary to achieve
the postsecondary attainment goal established in G.S. 116C-10.
(5) Additional investment is necessary to scale and integrate technology
supporting seamless postsecondary transfer and reverse transfer.
SECTION 4.2.(b) Initiative; Administration. – For the 2026-2027 academic year,
The University of North Carolina System Office, in collaboration with the Community Colleges
System Office, shall expand the current initiative (Initiative) to accelerate the transfer of course
credits among postsecondary institutions of higher education using postsecondary transfer
technology. This expanded Initiative shall provide and improve technology at participating
institutions of higher education that will simplify the credit transfer process for students, advisors,
and the participating institutions. The expanded Initiative shall allow students to easily compare
credit transfer options, speed up student decision making, and streamline transfer planning and
progress toward degrees in a manner that reduces overall costs for students in the State.
SECTION 4.2.(c) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of two million five hundred
thousand dollars ($2,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the
Senate Bill 986-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
expanded Initiative described in subsection (a) of this section. The University of North Carolina
System Office shall use these funds to identify and develop programs to accelerate the transfer
of course credits among postsecondary institutions of higher education in accordance with this
section.
SECTION 4.2.(d) Report. – No later than March 15, 2027, The University of North
Carolina System Office shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on
the Initiative, including at least the following information:
(1) The number and identity of institutions participating in the Initiative.
(2) The progress of each participating institution in the following areas, with data
disaggregated on the basis of income, race, ethnicity, and other demographic
characteristics, where available:
a. Enrollments upon transfer.
b. Credentials attained as a result of the successful transfer of credits.
(3) Recommendations to scale credit mobility and transfer technology statewide,
including identification of data system needs and opportunities to further
reduce the time it takes for a student to receive a degree and any other student
costs.

PART V. NC CAREERS ENHANCEMENT
SECTION 5.(a) Findings. – The General Assembly finds that (i) maintaining a
high-quality, up-to-date central platform to disseminate information on career exploration, career
planning, and alignment of education to career pathways to meet workforce needs is a statewide
priority, (ii) NC Careers provides such a platform, (iii) enhancing NC Careers is essential to the
effective implementation of the provisions of G.S. 115C-158.10, and (iv) it is necessary that the
State provide funds to the Department of Commerce to enhance NC Careers and its ability to
serve as North Carolina's premier workforce information and career navigation resource for
students, parents, educators, jobseekers, and career counselors.
SECTION 5.(b) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the Information
Technology Reserve to the Department of Commerce the sum of one million five hundred
thousand dollars ($1,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to enhance NC
Careers in accordance with this subsection. Enhancements shall prioritize functionality that
supports individualized career planning, integration with programs of study and industry-related
credentials, information on licensure requirements as applicable, and use by career counselors,
advisors, and coaches embedded throughout a learner's experience across education and
workforce systems.

PART VI. NORTH CAROLINA COLLABORATORY TO EVALUATE AND REPORT
ON THE WORKFORCE ACT OF 2026
SECTION 6.(a) The North Carolina Collaboratory (Collaboratory) shall evaluate
the programs and initiatives established in Parts I through V of this act each academic year
through the 2029-2030 academic year. The Collaboratory shall report the results of its evaluation
to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by March 15 of each year through March
15, 2030. Each report shall include the following information:
(1) The total number of students and adult learners engaging with each program
or initiative established in this act.
(2) The total funds expended to implement, design, and operate each program or
initiative.
(3) The effects of the programs and initiatives in this act on achieving
postsecondary attainment and workforce outcomes.
SECTION 6.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina for the 2026-2027 fiscal year the sum of six
Page 4 Senate Bill 986-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) in nonrecurring funds to be allocated to the North Carolina
Collaboratory to conduct the evaluation and report described in this section.

PART VII. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 7. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Senate Bill 986-First Edition Page 5